Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 6 Secretary of State

17-6-1.
General powers and duties.

The secretary of state shall have those functions, powers, and duties relating to elections that may be provided by this title or any other law not inconsistent with this chapter. The secretary of state shall maintain a central roster of all elected and appointed officers of the state, including for each officer the nature of the officer’s tenure and the date of expiration of the officer’s term of office. The secretary of state shall maintain a central register of all persons registered to vote in the several cities and towns and shall add, amend, delete, and cancel any names appearing on the register as certified to the secretary by the several local boards and by the state board.

The secretary of state may compile and publish a complete edition of the election law that the secretary shall make available to all election officials and candidates upon request and without charge. The secretary of state shall receive and file certificates of election results as provided by this title.

Notwithstanding any provisions of the general laws to the contrary, the office of the secretary of state shall have the authority to submit and approve the specifications used by the department of administration in procuring voting systems, voting system-related services, and accessible voting equipment on behalf of the state.

The secretary of state, with the assistance of the board of elections, shall conduct a cybersecurity assessment of election systems and facilities. The cybersecurity assessment shall include an assessment of the voter registration system, voting equipment, mechanisms to transmit election results, electronic poll books, and security of facilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 191, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 293, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 366, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 476, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 59, § 1, effective June 15, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 60, § 1, effective June 15, 2022.

17-6-1.1.
Central voter register.

In addition to any other powers and duties given to the secretary by this title, the secretary of state is authorized to issue rules and regulations relative to the central voter register, and local boards of canvassers are hereby directed to comply with reasonable requests by the secretary of state for information to accurately maintain the central voter register.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 199, § 1.

17-6-1.2.
Statewide central voter register.

Given the development of the necessary technology and the potential availability of federal funds, the secretary of state shall procure a statewide central voter register in accordance with all relevant state purchasing requirements. The system shall include, but not be limited to:

A statewide database maintained by the secretary of state;

All necessary hardware and software for the thirty-nine (39) local boards of canvassers to maintain their local voter registration records;

All necessary hardware and software necessary for the electronic integration of voter registration records from the division of motor vehicles;

All necessary hardware and software for the electronic integration of voter registration records from certain agencies processing voter registrations in accordance with §

17-9.1-8

where the secretary of state finds that the number of registrations processed warrants the electronic integration; and

Additional terminals for access to the voter files as determined by the secretary of state.

Local boards of canvassers will have the responsibility and sole authority for any addition, correction, or deletion of information from their local voting records. The office of the secretary of state, or the designee of the secretary of state, shall provide training and technical support for all local boards of canvassers in the operation and maintenance of their local voter registration system.

The format and structure of the database shall be developed by the office of the secretary of state in conjunction with the vendor to whom the contract is awarded.

Funding for the procurement of the statewide central voter register shall be through federal funds appropriated to the state of Rhode Island, subject to appropriation by the general assembly, pursuant to election reform legislation adopted by the United States Congress in 2002.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 192, § 1.

17-6-1.3.
Designation of Chief State Election Official under the National Voter Registration Act.

The secretary of state is designated as the chief state election official under section 10 of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (42 U.S.C. 1973gg-8) to be responsible for the coordination of the State of Rhode Island’s responsibilities under that Act.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 29, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 30, § 1.

17-6-1.4.
Election systems cybersecurity review board.

The secretary of state shall establish an election systems cybersecurity review board. The review board shall be comprised of the secretary of state, or designee; the executive director of the board of elections, or designee; the executive director of the Rhode Island League of Cities and Towns, or designee; a representative from the Rhode Island national guard; a representative from the Rhode Island state police; and a representative from the Rhode Island division of information technology.

The secretary of state, or designee, shall serve as chairperson of the review board.

It shall be the duty of the election systems cybersecurity review board to review the assessments conducted by the board of elections and department of state and also to procure a third-party assessment of the election systems. The review board will provide a security analysis of the election systems and election facilities and shall issue a report based on its assessment with any recommendations to improve the cybersecurity of the election systems and election facilities.

The secretary of state shall adopt rules defining classes of protected election data and establish best practices for identifying and reducing risk to the electronic use, storage, and transmission of election data and the security of election systems.

The cybersecurity review board shall issue a report no later than two (2) months prior to a statewide primary election referenced in §

17-15-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 59, § 2, effective June 15, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 60, § 2, effective June 15, 2022.

17-6-2.
Primary elections.

The secretary of state shall, as otherwise provided by this title, prepare, print, and distribute the following forms relating to primary elections:

Declaration of candidacy;

Endorsement by party;

Primary nomination papers for national and state offices;

Certifications of the list of local candidates where primaries are to be conducted.

The secretary of state shall also receive and file primary nomination papers; and shall consult with the state board with respect to its administration of primary elections.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 2.

17-6-3.
Computer ballots and sample ballots.

The secretary of state shall be responsible for the arrangement, preparation, printing, and provision of all computer ballots, to be used in conjunction with the optical scan voting equipment authorized pursuant to this title, and sample ballots to be used at any election. The secretary of state shall deliver to the state board a sufficient quantity of sample ballots to be used by the board in the preparation of voting equipment for each election.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 5; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 5.

17-6-4.
Absentee, shut-in, and war ballots.

The secretary of state shall prepare, print, and furnish all application forms for absentee, shut-in, and war ballots. The secretary of state shall arrange, print, and distribute all these ballots, together with instruction sheets and the required envelopes, in accordance with the requirements of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-6-5.
Registration lists available to political parties and candidates.

Upon application in writing, the secretary of state shall, upon request, furnish prepaid at a reasonable price to be established annually by the secretary and at a reasonable time, to the state chairperson of each political party and to each person proposing to be a duly qualified candidate for state or congressional office and to no one else except as provided in this chapter, lists of registered voters as they appear in the central voter registry of each city or town or of each senatorial or representative district, or of each congressional district.

These lists, so furnished, shall be used by the chairpersons for political purposes, or by the candidates only in the furtherance of candidacy for political office in the ensuing primary and/or general election and for no other purpose. The information available for each registrant shall consist only of the name, designation of party affiliation, street address, city or town, congressional district, senatorial district, representative district, ward, and/or precinct and nothing else.

The price for these lists shall include update subscriptions as available to the date of the election for which the lists have been requested. These updates shall reflect changes to the registry records, including all new and deleted voters as received by the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 207, § 1.

17-6-6.
Oath required as to use of lists.

Every person receiving the registry lists shall take and subscribe to the following oath:

“I understand that the lists requested by me are the property of the state of Rhode Island and (I affirm that I am the state chairperson of the
_______________
party); (I proposed to be a duly qualified candidate in the next following primary and/or election); and that I am a person authorized by §

17-6-5

to receive a copy of the registry lists described; and I further affirm that the lists will be used only for the purposes prescribed and for no other use and that I will not permit the use of or copying of the lists by unauthorized persons.

_______________

Signature of purchaser

Subscribed and sworn to before me at
_______________ , this
_______________
day of
_______________ , 20 _______________ .

_______________

Notary public”

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 207, § 1.

17-6-7.
Penalty for violating §§ 17-6-5 and 17-6-6.

Every person who violates the provisions of §§

17-6-5

and

17-6-6

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 3.

17-6-8.
Exception for local canvassing authorities.

The secretary of state shall furnish, without charge, to the canvassing authorities of the several cities and towns, lists of registrants pertaining to those respective cities and towns.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 207, § 1.

17-6-9.
Public record.

All requests for registration lists, and the action taken on those requests by the secretary of state, shall be deemed to be public records and shall be open for inspection during regular business hours.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 207, § 1.

17-6-10.
Availability of registration lists.

These lists shall be made available by the secretary of state not later than June 1 in any year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 28.

17-6-11.
Lists not deemed official.

Registration lists purchased pursuant to §§

17-6-5

—

17-6-10

are not to be deemed to be the official voting lists for any districts. The official lists are those prepared and published by the several local boards.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 207, § 1.

17-6-12.
Form of lists.

The lists may be distributed as requested in the form of either printed lists or magnetic tapes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 207, § 1.

17-6-13.
Electoral process education — Voter information hotline.

During each year in which a general election is to be held, the secretary of state shall identify communities within the state in need of electoral process education by outreaching community organizations. Electoral process education shall consist of instruction on how a person may become a candidate for electoral office and how a person registers and votes for candidates for electoral office. The secretary of state shall furnish electoral process education throughout the state of Rhode Island in a manner to be determined by the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall make available a free telephone hotline to provide the public with information about the electoral process, including the voting process, registering to vote, and polling locations. This hotline shall be available in multiple languages.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 1, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 1, effective June 7, 2022.

17-6-14.
Cybersecurity training for local boards of canvassers.

The secretary of state shall offer training annually regarding cybersecurity best practices to local boards of canvassers.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 59, § 2, effective June 15, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 60, § 2, effective June 15, 2022.